Wisconsin, session 2025, AB800.
do enact as follows:AB800,11Section 1. 5.84 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB800,3,625.84 (1) Where any municipality employs an electronic voting system which 3that utilizes automatic tabulating equipment, either at the polling place or at a 4central counting location, the municipal clerk shall, on any day not more than 10 5days prior to the election day on which the equipment is to be utilized in an election, 6have the equipment tested to ascertain that it will correctly count the votes cast for 7all offices and on all measures. Public notice of the time and place of the test shall 8be given by the clerk at least 48 hours prior to the test by publication of a class 1 9notice under ch. 985 in one or more newspapers published within the municipality 10if a newspaper is published therein, otherwise in a newspaper of general circulation 11therein posting notice as provided in s. 10.04 or 10.05, as applicable, and on the 12municipality’s website if it has one. The test shall be open to the public. The test 13shall be conducted by processing a preaudited group of ballots so marked as to 14record a predetermined number of valid votes for each candidate and on each 15referendum. The test shall include for each office one or more ballots which have 16votes in excess of the number allowed by law and, for a partisan primary election, 1one or more ballots which have votes cast for candidates of more than one 2recognized political party, in order to test the ability of the automatic tabulating 3equipment to reject such votes. If any error is detected, the municipal clerk shall 4ascertain the cause and correct the error. The clerk shall make an errorless count 5before the automatic tabulating equipment is approved by the clerk for use in the 6election.AB800,27Section 2. 6.15 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB800,3,1286.15 (4) (a) Clerks holding new resident ballots shall deliver them to the 9election inspectors in the proper ward or election district where the new residents 10reside or, in municipalities where absentee ballots are canvassed under s. 7.52, to 11the municipal board of absentee ballot canvassers when it convenes at a meeting 12convened under s. 7.52 (1), as provided by s. 6.88 for absentee ballots.AB800,313Section 3. 6.15 (4) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB800,3,19146.15 (4) (b) During polling hours, or on the day before the election under s. 156.88 (4), the inspectors shall open each carrier envelope, announce the elector’s 16name, check the affidavit for proper execution, and check the voting qualifications 17for the ward, if any. In municipalities where absentee ballots are canvassed under 18s. 7.52, the municipal board of absentee ballot canvassers shall perform this 19function at a meeting of the board of absentee ballot canvassers.AB800,420Section 4. 6.86 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB800,4,22216.86 (1) (b) Except as provided in this section, if application is made by mail, 22the application shall be received no later than 5 p.m. on the 5th day immediately 23preceding the election. If application is made in person, the application shall be 1made no earlier than 14 days preceding the election and no later than the Sunday 2preceding the election. No application may be received on a legal holiday. A 3municipality shall specify the hours in the notice under s. 10.01 (2) (e). The 4municipal clerk or an election official shall witness the certificate for any in-person 5absentee ballot cast. Except as provided in par. (c), if the elector is making written 6application for an absentee ballot at the partisan primary, the general election, the 7presidential preference primary, or a special election for national office, and the 8application indicates that the elector is a military elector, as defined in s. 6.34 (1), 9the application shall be received by the municipal clerk no later than 5 p.m. on 10election day. If the application indicates that the reason for requesting an absentee 11ballot is that the elector is a sequestered juror, the application shall be received no 12later than 5 p.m. on election day. If the application is received after 5 p.m. on the 13Friday immediately preceding the election, the municipal clerk or the clerk’s agent 14shall immediately take the ballot to the court in which the elector is serving as a 15juror and deposit it with the judge. The judge shall recess court, as soon as 16convenient, and give the elector the ballot. The judge shall then witness the voting 17procedure as provided in s. 6.87 and shall deliver the ballot to the clerk or agent of 18the clerk who shall deliver it to the polling place election inspectors of the proper 19ward or election district or, in municipalities where absentee ballots are canvassed 20under s. 7.52, to the municipal clerk as required in s. 6.88. If application is made 21under sub. (2) or (2m), the application may be received no later than 5 p.m. on the 22Friday immediately preceding the election.AB800,523Section 5. 6.87 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:AB800,5,716.87 (6) The ballot shall be returned so it is delivered to the polling place 2election inspectors of the proper ward or election district no later than 8 p.m. on 3election day. Except in municipalities where absentee ballots are canvassed under 4s. 7.52, if the municipal clerk receives an absentee ballot on election day, the clerk 5shall secure the ballot and cause the ballot to be delivered to the polling place 6serving the elector’s residence before 8 p.m. Any ballot not mailed or delivered as 7provided in this subsection may not be counted.AB800,68Section 6. 6.88 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB800,6,296.88 (1) When an absentee ballot arrives at the office of the municipal clerk, 10or at an alternate site under s. 6.855, if applicable, the clerk shall enclose it, 11unopened, in a carrier envelope which shall be securely sealed and endorsed with 12the name and official title of the clerk, and the words “This envelope contains the 13ballot of an absent elector and must be opened in the same room where votes are 14being cast at the polls during polling hours on election day or, in municipalities 15where absentee ballots are canvassed under s. 7.52, stats., at a meeting of the 16municipal board of absentee ballot canvassers under s. 7.52, stats only as provided 17by law.” If the elector is a military elector, as defined in s. 6.34 (1), or an overseas 18elector, regardless of whether the elector qualifies as a resident of this state under 19s. 6.10, and the ballot was received by the elector by facsimile transmission or 20electronic mail and is accompanied by a separate certificate, the clerk shall enclose 21the ballot in a certificate envelope and securely append the completed certificate to 22the outside of the envelope before enclosing the ballot in the carrier envelope. The 1clerk shall keep the ballot in the clerk’s office or at the alternate site, if applicable 2until delivered, as required in sub. (2).AB800,73Section 7. 6.88 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB800,6,1646.88 (2) When an absentee ballot is received by the municipal clerk prior to 5the delivery of the official ballots to the election officials of the ward in which the 6elector resides or, where absentee ballots are canvassed under s. 7.52, to the 7municipal board of absentee ballot canvassers, the municipal clerk shall seal the 8ballot envelope in the carrier envelope as provided under sub. (1), and shall enclose 9the envelope in a package and deliver the package to the election inspectors of the 10proper ward or election district or, in municipalities where absentee ballots are 11canvassed under s. 7.52, to the municipal board of absentee ballot canvassers when 12it convenes at a meeting convened under s. 7.52 (1). When the official ballots for the 13ward or election district have been delivered to the election inspectors before the 14receipt of an absentee ballot, the clerk shall immediately enclose the envelope 15containing the absentee ballot in a carrier envelope as provided under sub. (1) and 16deliver it in person to the proper election officials.AB800,817Section 8. 6.88 (4) of the statutes is created to read:AB800,6,21186.88 (4) (a) 1. The governing body of any municipality not specified in s. 7.52 19(1) (a) and having one polling place only may provide by ordinance that absentee 20ballots received by the municipal clerk may be canvassed on the day before the 21election.AB800,7,2222. Prior to enacting an ordinance under subd. 1., the municipal clerk shall 1notify the commission in writing of the proposed enactment and shall consult with 2the commission concerning administration of this subsection.AB800,7,53(am) In any municipality having an ordinance under par. (a), subject to pars. 4(b) to (e), the election inspectors may convene a meeting to begin canvassing 5absentee ballots no earlier than 7 a.m. on the day before the election.AB800,7,116(b) The municipal clerk shall give at least 60 days’ notice of a meeting under 7this subsection. Any member of the public has the same right of access to observe 8the proceedings at a meeting under this subsection that the individual would have 9under s. 7.41. The election inspectors may order the removal of any individual 10exercising the right to observe the proceedings if the individual disrupts the 11meeting.AB800,8,212(c) When the meeting of the election inspectors recesses on the day before the 13election, the election inspectors shall secure the automatic tabulating equipment, 14and the areas where the programmed media, memory devices, and absentee ballots 15are housed, with tamper-evident security seals in a double-lock location such as a 16locked cabinet inside a locked office. Before resuming the canvassing of absentee 17ballots on election day, the election inspectors shall check and record the status of 18each tamper-evident seal. The election inspectors shall immediately notify the 19commission of any evidence of tampering. If the election inspectors discover 20evidence of tampering with respect to automatic tabulating equipment, the canvass 21may not resume until the equipment is replaced and the replacement equipment is 22tested as provided in s. 5.84, except that public notice need not be provided 48 hours 23prior to the test. If the election inspectors discover evidence of tampering under 1this paragraph, the commission shall verify the accuracy of the absentee ballot 2count in the municipality in the election by doing all of the following:AB800,8,531. Ordering the municipality to conduct a recount after the election of all 4absentee ballots cast in the municipality in the election. The commission’s order 5shall establish procedures for the recount consistent with s. 9.01.AB800,8,762. Auditing the election equipment in the same manner as audits are 7conducted under s. 7.08 (6).AB800,8,98(d) Votes on absentee ballots canvassed under this subsection may not be 9tallied until after the polls close on election day.AB800,8,1310(e) No person may intentionally act in a manner that would give him or her 11the ability to know or to provide information on the tallied results from the ballots 12canvassed under this subsection before the polls close on election day. Whoever 13intentionally violates this paragraph is guilty of a Class I felony.AB800,8,1514(f) An ordinance under par. (a) may not take effect less than 60 days before an 15election.AB800,916Section 9. 7.52 (1) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 7.52 (1) (a) 1. and 17amended to read:AB800,9,11187.52 (1) (a) 1. The governing body of any municipality may provide by 19ordinance that, in lieu of canvassing absentee ballots at polling places under s. 6.88, 20the municipal board of absentee ballot canvassers designated under s. 7.53 (2m) 21shall, at each election held in the municipality, canvass all absentee ballots received 22by the municipal clerk by 8 p.m. on election day. Prior to enacting an ordinance 23under this subsection subdivision, the municipal clerk or board of election 1commissioners of the municipality shall notify the elections commission in writing 2of the proposed enactment and shall consult with the elections commission 3concerning administration of this section. At every election held in the 4municipality following enactment of an ordinance under this subsection 5subdivision, the board of absentee ballot canvassers shall, any time after the 6opening of the polls 7 a.m. on the day before the election and before 10 p.m. on 7election day, publicly convene to count the canvass absentee ballots for the 8municipality. If the board of absentee ballot canvassers convenes on the day before 9the election, the board of absentee ballot canvassers shall recess no later than 8 10p.m. on that day, and the meeting shall reconvene no earlier than 7 a.m. on election 11day.AB800,9,18122. The municipal clerk shall give at least 48 hours’ 60 days’ notice of any the 13meeting under this subsection. Any member of the public has the same right of 14access to a meeting of the municipal board of absentee ballot canvassers under this 15subsection that the individual would have under s. 7.41 to observe the proceedings 16at a polling place. The board of absentee ballot canvassers may order the removal of 17any individual exercising the right to observe the proceedings if the individual 18disrupts the meeting.AB800,1019Section 10. 7.52 (1) (d) to (f) of the statutes are created to read:AB800,9,23207.52 (1) (d) When the meeting of the board of absentee ballot canvassers 21recesses on the day before the election, the board of absentee ballot canvassers shall 22secure the automatic tabulating equipment, and the areas where the programmed 23media, memory devices, and absentee ballots are housed, with tamper-evident 1security seals in a double-lock location such as a locked cabinet inside a locked 2office. Before resuming the canvassing of ballots on election day, the board of 3absentee ballot canvassers shall check and record the status of each tamper-evident 4seal. The board of absentee ballot canvassers shall immediately notify the 5commission of any evidence of tampering. If the board of absentee ballot canvassers 6discovers evidence of tampering with respect to automatic tabulating equipment, 7the canvass may not resume until the equipment is replaced and the replacement 8equipment is tested as provided in s. 5.84, except that public notice need not be 9provided 48 hours prior to the test. If the board of absentee ballot canvassers 10discovers evidence of tampering under this paragraph, the commission shall verify 11the accuracy of the absentee ballot count in the municipality in the election by doing 12all of the following:AB800,10,15131. Ordering the municipality to conduct a recount after the election of all 14absentee ballots cast in the municipality in the election. The commission’s order 15shall establish procedures for the recount consistent with s. 9.01.AB800,10,17162. Auditing the election equipment in the same manner as audits are 17conducted under s. 7.08 (6).AB800,10,1918(e) Votes on absentee ballots canvassed under this section may not be tallied 19until after the polls close on election day.AB800,10,2320(f) No person may intentionally act in a manner that would give him or her the 21ability to know or to provide information on the tallied results from the ballots 22canvassed under this section before the polls close on election day. Whoever 23intentionally violates this paragraph is guilty of a Class I felony.AB800,111Section 11. 7.52 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB800,11,1027.52 (2) In counting the absentee ballots, the board of absentee ballot 3canvassers shall use 2 duplicate copies of a single poll list for the entire 4municipality prepared in accordance with s. 6.36 (2). Upon accepting reviewing 5each absentee ballot certificate envelope to ensure that it satisfies all applicable 6legal requirements, the board of absentee ballot canvassers shall enter a poll list 7sequential count number on the poll list next to the name of the elector who voted 8the ballot, beginning with the number one. If the elector’s name does not appear on 9the poll list, the board of absentee ballot canvassers shall enter the number on a 10separate list maintained under this subsection. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab800 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab800 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB800 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB800 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB800: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting